Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-907.04
Proposed rule or regulation; explanatory statement; contents; use.

(1) At the time an agency finalizes a proposed rule or regulation and prior to submission to the Secretary of State, Attorney General, and Governor, the agency shall attach to the proposed rule or regulation a concise explanatory statement containing:

(a) Its reasons for adopting the rule or regulation;

(b) An indication of any change between the text of the proposed rule or regulation contained or referenced in the published notice and the text of the rule or regulation to be adopted, with the reasons for any change; and

(c) When procedural rules differ from the model rules, the agency's reasons why relevant portions of the model rules were impracticable under the circumstances.

(2) Only the reasons contained in the concise explanatory statement may be used by an agency as justifications for the adoption of the rule or regulation in any proceeding in which its validity is at issue.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 22.